Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-103
Volunteer firefighters; members in good standing.

Members in good standing are hereby defined to be those who keep their dues promptly paid up, and are present and render active service when called out for the legitimate purposes of their organization.

Laws 1867 (Ter.), § 3, p. 16;

G.S.1873, c. 24, § 3, p. 390;

R.S.1913, § 2498;

C.S.1922, § 2436;

C.S.1929, § 35-103;

R.S.1943, § 35-103.